Hawaii statutes.
§606-14 Bailiffs. The judge of the
circuit court of each judicial circuit or division may appoint a person to be
known as "court officer and bailiff" or "special court
officer". Each of the persons so appointed shall be removable by the
judge by whom the person is appointed, except as otherwise provided. In the
first circuit one of the persons so appointed shall be designated as
"chief court officer and bailiff," and another as "assistant
chief court officer and bailiff".

The court officers and bailiffs or special
court officers shall attend upon the trial of causes, keep order in the
courtroom and judiciary building, serve notices and other process of the court
as directed by any judge of the court, summon jurors and under the supervision
of the respective courtroom clerks, have custody over juries and perform any
other duties in and around the court as shall be from time to time required of
them by the presiding judges or by rule of court. They shall be in attendance
during all sessions of the court and perform other duties during business hours
or during emergencies as may be required of them by the respective judges,
absenting themselves only upon special permission from the judge presiding in
the court or from the chief court officer and bailiff.

They shall receive for their services salaries
as provided by law. They shall not be entitled to any fees for the service of
process or for the performance of any other service, but where fees are
chargeable by law for such services, such fees shall become a general
governmental realization. If required to serve any notice or process they
shall be entitled to reimbursement for reasonable actual expenses for
transportation, to be paid out of circuit court expenses, in such sums as may
be approved by a judge of the court.

In the performance of their duties they shall
have the general powers of a police officer, including all of the authority,
powers, and duties as set forth in chapter 803; provided they shall not
interfere with the work of the sheriff, the chiefs of police or their deputies
in the service of any process for which fees are paid.

An appointee under this section who, at the
time of the appointment, is a member of any pension or retirement fund provided
by law shall continue as such member after the appointment with the same rights
to prior and subsequent service credit as if the appointee had remained in the
service of the State or county in any former service. [L 1941, c 332, §1; RL
1945, §9734; am L 1945, c 249, §1; RL 1955, §218-14; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS
§606-14; am L 1972, c 88, §4(m); gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990,
c 281, §11]

Cross References

Sheriff, etc., see §26-14.6.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next